Missouri, session 2026, HB3079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 168 and 169, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 168.310 and 169.599, to read as follows:
168.310. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person employed as
a speech-language pathologist in a Missouri public school district or charter school shall
be recognized as holding equivalent status to certificated teaching personnel under this
chapter, provided that such person holds a valid license to practice speech-language
pathology issued under chapter 345 by the Missouri board of healing arts.
2. The department of elementary and secondary education shall issue an
appropriate teaching certificate designation for such persons for the purposes of
employment, benefits, and retirement system eligibility.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3079 2
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
169.599. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any speech-language
pathologist employed by a Missouri public school district or charter school who is
certified under section 168.310 shall be deemed a teacher for the purposes of
membership in and receiving benefits from the public school retirement system of
Missouri under this chapter.
2. Such persons shall be eligible for participation in the public school retirement
system under the same terms and conditions as certificated teachers including, but not
limited to, contribution rates, service credit, retirement benefits, and survivor benefits.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with
the board of trustees of the public school retirement system, may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
Section B. The enactment of sections 168.310 and 169.599 of this act shall become
effective on July 1, 2027.
✔